California statutes. Streets and Highways Code
(7) Projects that employ advanced and innovative technology to improve the flow of freight, such as intelligent transportation systems, public infrastructure, excluding vehicles, that enables zero-emission or near-zero emission goods movement, real time information systems, weigh-in-motion devices, electronic screening and credentialing systems, traffic signal optimization, work zone management and information systems, ramp metering, and electronic cargo and border security technologies.

(8) Environmental and community mitigation or efforts to reduce environmental impacts of freight movement, such as projects that reduce noise, overnight truck idling, or truck queues, and advanced traveler information systems such as freight advanced traveler information systems that optimize operations to reduce empty-load trips.

(d) Projects funded with revenues identified in paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) shall be consistent with Article XIX of the California Constitution.

(e) (1) In adopting the program of projects to be funded with funds described in subdivision (a), the commission shall evaluate the total potential economic and noneconomic benefits of the program of projects to California’s economy, environment, and public health. The evaluation shall specifically assess localized impacts in disadvantaged communities. The commission shall consult with the agencies identified in Executive Order No. B-32-15 and metropolitan planning organizations in order to use the appropriate models, techniques, and methods to develop the parameters for evaluating the program of projects. The commission shall allocate the funding from subdivision (a) for trade infrastructure improvements as
 follows:

(A) Sixty percent of the funds shall be available for projects nominated by regional transportation agencies and other public agencies, including counties, cities, and port authorities, in consultation with the department. The commission shall provide reasonable geographic targets for funding allocations without constraining what an agency may propose or what the commission may approve.

(B) Forty percent of the funds shall be available for projects nominated by the department, in consultation with regional transportation agencies.

(2) In adopting a program of projects pursuant to paragraph (1), the commission shall prioritize projects jointly nominated and jointly funded by the state and local agencies. In considering geographic balance for the overall program, the commission may adjust the corridor-based
 targets in subparagraph (A) of paragraph (1) to account for projects programmed pursuant to subparagraph (B) of paragraph (1).

(f) (1) The commission shall adopt guidelines, including a transparent process to evaluate projects and to allocate the funding described in subdivision (a) for trade infrastructure improvements in a manner that (A) addresses the state’s most urgent needs, (B) balances the demands of various land ports of entry, seaports, and airports, (C) places emphasis on projects that improve trade corridor mobility and safety while reducing emissions of diesel particulates, greenhouse gases, and other pollutants and reducing other negative community impacts, especially in disadvantaged communities, (D) makes a significant contribution to the state’s economy, (E) recognizes the key role of the state in project identification, (F) supports integrating statewide goods movement priorities in a corridor approach,
 and (G) includes disadvantaged communities measures, as established by the California Environmental Protection Agency pursuant to Section 39711 of the Health and Safety Code, and other tools the commission determines, for evaluating benefits or costs for disadvantaged communities and low-income communities. Project nominations shall include either a quantitative or qualitative assessment of the benefits the project is expected to achieve relative to the evaluation criteria.

(2) The guidelines adopted pursuant to paragraph (1) may include streamlining of project delivery by authorizing regional transportation agencies and other public agencies to seek commission approval of a letter of no prejudice that allows the agency to expend its own funds for a project programmed in a future year of the adopted program of projects, in advance of allocation of funds to the project by the commission, and to be reimbursed at a later time for eligible
 expenditures. A letter of no prejudice shall only be available to local or regional transportation agencies for moneys that have been identified for future allocation to the applicant agency. Moneys designated for the program shall only be reimbursed when there is funding available in an amount sufficient to make the reimbursement.

(g) In addition, the commission shall also consider the following factors when allocating these funds:

(1) “Velocity,” which means the speed by which large cargo would travel from the land port of entry or seaport through the distribution system.

(2) “Throughput,” which means the volume of cargo that would move from the land port of entry or seaport through the distribution system.

(3) “Reliability,” which means a reasonably
 consistent and predictable amount of time for cargo to travel from one point to another on any given day or at any given time in California.

(4) “Congestion reduction,” which means the reduction in recurrent daily hours of delay to be achieved.

(h) For purposes of this section, the following terms have the following meanings:

(1) “Disadvantaged communities” are those communities identified by the California Environmental Protection Agency pursuant to Section 39711 of the Health and Safety Code.

(2) “Low-income communities” are census tracts with median household incomes at or below 80 percent of the statewide median income or with median household incomes at or below the threshold designated as low income by the Department of Housing and Community
 Development’s list of state income limits adopted pursuant to Section 50093 of the Health and Safety Code.

(i) It is the intent of the Legislature for the commission to adopt an initial program of projects using the state and federal funds described in subdivision (a) for eligible projects as soon as practicable and no later than May 17, 2018.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 769, Sec. 5.   (SB 671)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

2192.1.

(a) To the extent moneys from the Greenhouse Gas Reduction Fund, attributable to the auction or sale of allowances as part of a market-based compliance mechanism relative to reduction of greenhouse gas emissions, are transferred to the Trade Corridors Improvement Fund, projects funded with those moneys shall be subject to all of the requirements of existing law applicable to the expenditure of moneys appropriated from the Greenhouse Gas Reduction Fund, including, but not limited to, both of the following:

(1) Projects shall further the regulatory purposes of the California Global Warming Solutions Act of 2006 (Division 25.5 (commencing with Section 38500) of the Health and Safety Code), including
 reducing emissions from greenhouse gases in the state, directing public and private investment toward disadvantaged communities, increasing the diversity of energy sources, or creating opportunities for businesses, public agencies, nonprofits, and other community institutions to participate in and benefit from statewide efforts to reduce emissions of greenhouse gases.

(2) Projects shall be consistent with the guidance developed by the State Air Resources Board pursuant to Section 39715 of the Health and Safety Code.

(b) All allocations of funds made by the commission pursuant to this section shall be made in a manner consistent with the criteria expressed in Section 39712 of the Health and Safety Code and with the investment plan developed by the Department of Finance pursuant to Section 39716 of the Health and Safety Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 787, Sec. 2.   (SB 1228)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

2192.2.

The commission shall allocate funds made available by this chapter to projects that have identified and committed supplemental funding from appropriate local, federal, or private sources. The commission shall determine the appropriate amount of supplemental funding each project should have to be eligible for moneys from the fund based on a project-by-project review and an assessment of the project’s benefit to the state and the program. The commission may give priority for funding to projects with higher levels of committed supplemental funding.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 95, Sec. 18.   (SB 103)   Effective July 21, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

2192.3.

The commission shall include in its annual report to the Legislature, required by Section 14535 of the Government Code, a summary of its activities related to the administration of this chapter. The summary shall, at a minimum, include a description and the location of the projects contained in the program funded by the fund, the amount of funds allocated to each project, the status of each project, and a description of the mobility and air quality improvements the program is achieving.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 787, Sec. 2.   (SB 1228)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

2192.4.

The Trade Corridor Enhancement Account is hereby created in the State Transportation Fund to receive funds from subdivision (b) of Section 60050 of the Revenue and Taxation Code, as adjusted. Funds in the account shall be available for expenditure upon appropriation by the Legislature for corridor-based freight projects nominated by local agencies and the state.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 5, Sec. 42.   (SB 1)   Effective April 28, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 4.9. Port-Related Cargo [2196. - 2196.3.]

2196.

The Port of Los Angeles and the Port of Long Beach shall evaluate changes to the goods movement network to gauge adherence by those ports to the state goals in subdivisions (i) and (j) of Section 1 of the statute enacting this chapter and shall collect statistics on the operation of the two ports regarding compliance with federal, state, and local efforts to achieve all of the following:

(a) Utilization of off-peak hours at port terminals. For the purposes of this section, “off-peak hours” means Monday through Friday between the hours of 6 p.m. and 3 a.m., and all day on Saturdays and Sundays.

(b) Utilization of distribution centers during off-peak hours.

(c) Utilization of rail facilities.

(d) Appointments made at port terminals during peak and off-peak hours through the appointment system as described in Chapter 1129 of the Statutes of 2002.

(e) Appointments honored at port terminals during peak and off-peak hours.

(History: Added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 941, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

2196.1.

The Port of Los Angeles and the Port of Long Beach, to the extent practicable, shall provide the statistical data on imports and exports obtained pursuant to Section 2196 to the Business, Transportation and Housing Agency, the Office of Goods Movement of the Department of Transportation, and the Assembly and Senate Committees on Transportation. That information shall be provided on or before January 31, 2006, and annually thereafter through 2008.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 187, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

2196.2.

(a) Subject to the appropriation of funds for this purpose, the Transportation Agency, in consultation with the Department of Transportation, shall develop and administer contracts, grants, or other funding mechanisms to invest in port-specific high-priority projects that increase goods movement capacity on rail and roadways serving ports and at port terminals.

(b) It is the intent of the Legislature that funds appropriated for this section achieve the following goals:

(1) Improve the capacity of California ports to manage increasing volumes of freight and improve the efficiency of goods movement to, from, and through California ports.

(2) Reduce greenhouse gas emissions and freight-related air pollution.

(3) Promote transportation equity.

(4) Maintain, enhance, and modernize the multimodal freight transportation system.

(5) Grow the economic competitiveness of California’s freight sector through increased system efficiency and productivity.

(6) Reduce freight-related deaths and injuries.

(7) Improve system resilience by addressing infrastructure vulnerabilities associated with security threats, climate change, and natural disasters.

(c) Of the funds appropriated for this section, no more than 2
 percent may be used for state operations and other administrative costs, with the remaining funding to be used for investments in eligible projects.

(d) Projects eligible for funding include, but are not limited to, the following:

(1) Port-specific high-priority projects.

(2) Intermodal railyard expansion and electrification.

(3) Goods movement railway corridor capacity projects.

(4) High-priority grade separations.

(5) Zero-emission goods movement demonstration projects.

(e) Funding for projects eligible pursuant to subdivision (a) shall be allocated to public
 agencies that administer or operate the projects as follows:

(1) Seventy percent for infrastructure projects, each supporting goods movement related to the Port of Los Angeles, the Port of Long Beach, or both.

(2) Thirty percent for other high-priority projects supporting ports and goods movement infrastructure in the rest of the state, including inland ports.

(f) Public agencies may partner with private operators of projects, such as freight railroads, to implement an eligible project.

(g) Funds awarded under this section shall not be used for the purchase of fully automated cargo handling equipment nor for infrastructure that is used to support fully automated cargo handling equipment.

(h) (1) The Transportation Agency shall develop guidelines for project selection in consultation with the ports and other stakeholders consistent with the goals listed in subdivision (b). The guidelines shall be exempt from the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code).

(2) In developing the guidelines pursuant to paragraph (1), and consistent with the goal of leveraging as much matching funding as possible as stated in subdivision (i), program guidelines may prioritize projects for which local, federal, or private match funding is available.

(i) (1) It is the intent of the Legislature that the allocation of funding described in this section be used to leverage the maximum amount of federal funding and financing available to California
 from federal infrastructure credit programs through the Transportation Agency and the United States Department of Transportation Emerging Projects Agreement, from the federal Infrastructure Investment and Jobs Act 2021 (Public Law 117–58), and from other subsequent federal actions.

(2) In developing the guidelines pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (h), and consistent with the goal of leveraging as much matching funding as possible, the Transportation Agency may prioritize projects for which local, federal, or private match funding is available.

(j) Notwithstanding subdivision (d), allocations pursuant to this section shall comply with the requirements of paragraph (3) of subdivision (c) of Section 2192.

(k) The Transportation Agency shall, as part of the annual budget process, report to the Legislature on the
 implementation of this section. The report shall include, but not be limited to, the following information:

(1) The number of grants awarded, the dollar value of those awards, and the location of those awards.

(2) A description of the projects funded under this section, including the specific improvements funded and the likely impact of those projects on the port with which they are associated.

(3) Any lessons learned from the implementation of this section, including opportunities for additional investments in California’s multimodal freight transportation system.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 71, Sec. 13.   (SB 198)   Effective June 30, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

2196.3.

(a) A lead applicant agency may apply to the Secretary of Transportation or the secretary’s designee for a letter of no prejudice for a project or for any component of a project included in the program of projects awarded by the Transportation Agency pursuant to Section 2196.2. If approved by the Secretary of Transportation or the secretary’s designee, the letter of no prejudice shall allow the lead applicant agency to expend its own moneys for the project or any component of the project and to be eligible for future reimbursement from moneys available for the program.

(b) The amount expended under subdivision (a) shall be reimbursed by the state from moneys available for the program if all of the following conditions are met:

(1) The project or project component for which the letter of no prejudice was requested has commenced, and the regional or local expenditures have been incurred.

(2) The expenditures made by the lead applicant agency are eligible for reimbursement in accordance with applicable laws and procedures. If expenditures made by the lead applicant agency are determined to be ineligible, the state has no obligation to reimburse those expenditures.

(3) The lead applicant agency complies with all legal requirements for the project, including the requirements of the California Environmental Quality Act (Division 13 (commencing with Section 21000) of the Public Resources Code).

(4) There are moneys designated for the program that are sufficient to make the
 reimbursement payment.

(c) The lead applicant agency and the Transportation Agency shall enter into an agreement governing reimbursement as described in this section. The timing and final amount of reimbursement shall be dependent on the terms of the agreement and the availability of moneys for the program.

(d) The Transportation Agency may develop guidelines to implement this section, which shall be exempt from the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code).

(e) This section shall become inoperative on June 30, 2033, and, as of January 1, 2034, is repealed.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 53, Sec. 13.   (AB 173)   Effective July 2, 2024.   Inoperative June 30, 2033, by its own provisions.    Repealed as of January 1, 2034, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 5. Federal Aid for Secondary Highways [2200. - 2214.]

2200.

This chapter may be cited as the Federal-Aid Secondary Highways Act.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1979, Ch. 580.   Inoperative on date prescribed in Section 2202.   Repealed on January 1 after inoperative date, pursuant to Section 2202.)
-------------------------------------------

2201.

Various federal-aid highway acts have authorized appropriations for various programs for projects on secondary roads within this state. The purpose of this chapter is to implement such programs in this state. The commission, the department, and boards of supervisors are authorized to do all things necessary in their jurisdictions to secure such federal funds in accordance with the intent of the federal law and of this chapter.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1979, Ch. 580.   Inoperative on date prescribed in Section 2202.   Repealed on January 1 after inoperative date, pursuant to Section 2202.)
-------------------------------------------

2202.

The Legislature recognizes that federal aid for secondary highways was deleted from federal law by the Intermodal Surface Transportation Efficiency Act of 1991 (Public Law 102-240), and that a period of time is required to account for expenditures of federal funds provided for these purposes under previous federal transportation acts. This chapter shall remain in effect until the director determines that apportionments of all federal aid for secondary highways have been expended. Upon making that determination, the director shall submit a notice to that effect to the Secretary of State, and this chapter shall be repealed on January 1 following the receipt of that notice by the Secretary of State.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1177, Sec. 12.   Effective September 30, 1992.   Repealed on date prescribed by its own provisions.   Note: Termination clause affects Chapter 5, comprising Sections 2200 to 2214.)
-------------------------------------------

2203.

As used in this chapter, “county highway” means a county highway, as defined by Section 25, which is on the system of secondary and feeder roads as defined by Section 103(c) of Title 23 of the United States Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1979, Ch. 580.   Inoperative on date prescribed in Section 2202.   Repealed on January 1 after inoperative date, pursuant to Section 2202.)
-------------------------------------------

2204.

As used in this chapter, “county” does not include a city and county.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 192.   Inoperative on date prescribed in Section 2202.   Repealed on January 1 after inoperative date, pursuant to Section 2202.)
-------------------------------------------

2206.

As used in this chapter, “match” means to provide for the payment of the cost of any project to the extent that such cost is not to be paid from federal funds.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 192.   Inoperative on date prescribed in Section 2202.   Repealed on January 1 after inoperative date, pursuant to Section 2202.)
-------------------------------------------

2208.

Funds apportioned to this state pursuant to subdivision (b)(2) of Section 104 of Title 23 of the United States Code for the Federal-Aid Secondary System shall be apportioned by the department. At least 98 percent of such funds shall be apportioned among the counties in the manner and in accordance with the formula set forth in that subdivision, except that the census figures used in making the apportionment shall be those contained in the latest available federal census.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1979, Ch. 580.   Inoperative on date prescribed in Section 2202.   Repealed on January 1 after inoperative date, pursuant to Section 2202.)
-------------------------------------------

2209.

If the annual apportionment to a county pursuant to Section 2208 is less than 1 percent of the total of such allocations to all counties, the county may exchange its apportionment for an equal amount of nonfederal funds in the State Highway Account in the State Transportation Fund. If the apportionment to a county is more than 312 percent of the total of such allocations to all counties, the county may exchange that portion of its apportionment in excess of the 312 percent for an equal amount of nonfederal funds in the State Highway Account. Exchange funds received by a county pursuant to this section may be used for any highway construction purpose.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1979, Ch. 580.   Inoperative on date prescribed in Section 2202.   Repealed on January 1 after inoperative date, pursuant to Section 2202.)
-------------------------------------------

2210.

From nonfederal funds in the State Highway Account in the State Transportation Fund appropriated to match the funds apportioned pursuant to Section 2208, the commission shall allocate to each county an amount, not to exceed one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) each fiscal year, equal to 50 percent of the amount allocated to the county pursuant to that section. The amount shall not be reduced by any exchange of funds made pursuant to Section 2209. All funds allocated pursuant to this section shall be included in the computation of compliance with the requirements of Section 188. Funds allocated pursuant to this section shall be used to match federal funds. Any excess may be used for any highway construction purpose.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1979, Ch. 580.   Inoperative on date prescribed in Section 2202.   Repealed on January 1 after inoperative date, pursuant to Section 2202.)
-------------------------------------------

2211.

The department shall notify each county, as soon as possible each year, of the amount of money to be available for expenditure in the county from the federal apportionment and of the amount of money to be made available pursuant to Section 2210.

After receiving notice of apportionment from the department, each county shall have 60 days in which to notify the department as to what amount of the apportionment the county wishes to claim and to agree to provide matching funds therefor. The counties, in cooperation with the department, shall thereafter select projects in conformance with federal law. The counties shall prepare plans, specifications, and estimates of cost for construction of the projects, and shall certify the necessary right-of-way and shall submit such documents to the department to qualify for the federal funds.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1979, Ch. 580.   Inoperative on date prescribed in Section 2202.   Repealed on January 1 after inoperative date, pursuant to Section 2202.)
-------------------------------------------

2213.

By agreement with the department, a county may transfer all or part of the funds apportioned to it, and in its discretion matching funds, to a federal-aid secondary road project:

(a) In an adjoining county where the highway connects points in the two counties.

(b) In another county under such terms and conditions as are agreed upon by the department and the counties involved, including provisions relating to the reciprocal advancement of funds between the counties involved.

(c) In a city in the same county.

(d) For use with respect to a state highway in the same county or other county in the same county group as specified in Section 187. Such an expenditure of federal funds or the money apportioned by the state to match the unexpended balance of the federal aid shall not be deemed an expenditure to meet the requirements of Section 188.8.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 777, Sec. 87.   Inoperative on date prescribed in Section 2202.   Repealed on January 1 after inoperative date, pursuant to Section 2202.)
-------------------------------------------

2214.

Federal-aid secondary funds apportioned to any county under Section 2208 and not claimed or used as provided in Sections 2211 to 2213, inclusive, shall be expended on construction of projects upon the state highway system in the county group, as specified in Section 187, which includes the county from which released, to the extent that such may be done in conformity with federal law. The money apportioned by the state to match the unexpended balance of the federal aid in any county, in accordance with this section and the federal law, shall be deemed an expenditure to meet the requirements of Sections 188 and 188.8.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 777, Sec. 88.   Inoperative on date prescribed in Section 2202.   Repealed on January 1 after inoperative date, pursuant to Section 2202.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 5.1. Combined Road Plan [2220. - 2227.]

2220.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the Federal-Aid Combined Road Plan Act.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 647, Sec. 2.   Effective September 11, 1990.   Inoperative upon determination described in Section 2227.   Repealed on January 1 after inoperative date, as provided in Section 2227.)
-------------------------------------------

2221.

The purpose of this chapter is to implement the combined road plan demonstration program, pursuant to Section 137 of the Federal-Aid Highway Act of 1987, in this state in a manner compatible and consistent with historic programming goals. The department shall establish and distribute interim guidelines to appropriate local representatives with respect to the programming and management of combined road plan apportionments. The guidelines shall not be subject to Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 647, Sec. 2.   Effective September 11, 1990.   Inoperative upon determination described in Section 2227.   Repealed on January 1 after inoperative date, as provided in Section 2227.)
-------------------------------------------

2222.

Notwithstanding Chapters 5 (commencing with Section 2200), 7 (commencing with Section 2350), and 9 (commencing with Section 2400), this chapter applies to the administration of the Federal-Aid Combined Road Plan Demonstration Program as to funds appropriated under the Federal-Aid Highway Act of 1987, for the federal-aid secondary program, federal-aid urban program, and the off-system bridge, urban bridge, and secondary bridge programs.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 647, Sec. 2.   Effective September 11, 1990.   Inoperative upon determination described in Section 2227.   Repealed on January 1 after inoperative date, as provided in Section 2227.)
-------------------------------------------

2223.

Combined road plan apportionments received by this state under the Federal-Aid Highway Act of 1987 shall be allocated by the department to city, county, and urbanized areas consistent with procedures established under Chapters 5 (commencing with Section 2200) and 7 (commencing with Section 2350). That portion of combined road plan apportionments attributable to the federal bridge reconstruction and replacement program shall be obligated to bridge construction or other eligible use approved by the department.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 647, Sec. 2.   Effective September 11, 1990.   Inoperative upon determination described in Section 2227.   Repealed on January 1 after inoperative date, as provided in Section 2227.)
-------------------------------------------

2224.

(a) To assist the department in the performance of its duties in relation thereto, there is a statewide Combined Road Plan Committee, which consists of the following members:

(1) One urban representative of a regional transportation planning agency selected by the California Association of Councils of Governments.

(2) One rural representative of a regional transportation planning agency selected by the California Association of Councils of Governments.

(3) Two representatives of the California Transit Association, one of whom shall be a representative of a rail operator, and one of whom shall be a representative of a bus operator.

(4) One representative selected by the statutorily created county transportation commissions from the Counties of Los Angeles, Orange, Riverside, and San Bernardino.

(5) Six representatives, of whom three shall be from northern California, selected by the League of California Cities.

(6) Four representatives, of whom two shall be from northern California, selected by the County Supervisors Association of California.

(7) One representative from the department, who shall serve as an ex officio member.

(8) The Regional Division Administrator of the Federal Highway Administration, or the administrator’s designated representative, who shall serve as an ex officio member.

The names of the members of the committee shall be submitted to the director not later than 45 days after the date this section becomes operative.

(b) The committee shall advise the department on the administration of combined road plan apportionments and the establishment of interim guidelines for the use of all available apportionments within the demonstration period. The interim guidelines shall include, but not be limited to, a requirement that any funds apportioned under the Federal-Aid Combined Road Plan Demonstration Program pursuant to Section 2223 which are subject to reallocation shall be, as a first priority, reallocated to another local entity within the same county. The department may delegate authority for the establishment of local area guidelines to county combined road plan committees.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 647, Sec. 2.   Effective September 11, 1990.   Inoperative upon determination described in Section 2227.   Repealed on January 1 after inoperative date, as provided in Section 2227.)
-------------------------------------------

2225.

Section 2360 does not apply to funds apportioned and allocated under the combined road plan demonstration program.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 647, Sec. 2.   Effective September 11, 1990.   Inoperative upon determination described in Section 2227.   Repealed on January 1 after inoperative date, as provided in Section 2227.)
-------------------------------------------

2226.

For the duration of the combined road plan demonstration program, state matching funds and state exchange funds under Sections 2209 and 2210 shall continue to be made available, in the same amounts, to those agencies which received those funds in the 1988–89 fiscal year.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 647, Sec. 2.   Effective September 11, 1990.   Inoperative upon determination described in Section 2227.   Repealed on January 1 after inoperative date, as provided in Section 2227.)
-------------------------------------------

2227.

This chapter shall remain operative until the director determines that the federal combined road plan demonstration program is no longer in effect. The director shall submit a notice of the determination under this section to the Secretary of State, and this chapter shall be repealed on January 1 next following the receipt of that notice by the Secretary of State.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 647, Sec. 2.   Effective September 11, 1990.   Repealed on date prescribed by its own provisions.   Note: Termination clause affects Chapter 5.1, commencing with Section 2220.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 5.5. Federal Aid for Metropolitan Transportation Planning [2230. - 2234.]

2230.

This chapter may be cited as the Federal Aid for Metropolitan Transportation Planning Act.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 1470.)
-------------------------------------------

2231.

The Federal Aid Highway Act of 1973 has authorized appropriations for expenditure within urbanized areas for comprehensive transportation planning purposes. The purpose of this chapter is to implement such program in this state. The commission, the department, appropriate regional and local planning agencies, boards of supervisors, and city councils are authorized to do all things necessary in their respective jurisdictions to secure such federal funds in accordance with the intent of the federal act and of this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 777, Sec. 89.)
-------------------------------------------

2232.

As used in this chapter, “Transportation Planning and Development Account” means the Transportation Planning and Development Account created in the State Transportation Fund pursuant to Section 99310 of the Public Utilities Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 777, Sec. 90.)
-------------------------------------------

2233.

Amounts apportioned to the state pursuant to subsection (f) of Section 104 of Title 23 of the United States Code shall be identified in the budget of the Transportation Planning and Development Account in the State Transportation Fund. Amounts reimbursed to the state pursuant to subsection (f) of Section 104 of Title 23 of the United States Code shall be deposited in the State Highway Account and credited to the Transportation Planning and Development Account as an expense and reimbursement. All such funds apportioned to the state are continuously appropriated for allocation by the commission from the Transportation Planning and Development Account to metropolitan transportation planning organizations, as defined by federal law and regulations, to perform the metropolitan transportation planning authorized by subsection (f) of Section 104 of Title 23.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 777, Sec. 91.)
-------------------------------------------

2234.

The department shall establish operating procedures and take such other action as is appropriate to comply with the provisions of this chapter and with all applicable laws, rules, and regulations.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 1470.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 6. Federal Funds for Demonstration Projects [2300. - 2302.]

2300.

The department shall be responsible for coordinating the work necessary to carry out the Los Angeles demonstration project, as described in the financial plans adopted pursuant to Sections 307.1 and 347.1, financed with the federal funds made available by subdivision (a) of Section 131 of the Surface Transportation Assistance Act of 1982. The work shall generally be undertaken in accordance with the provisions of Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 2350), relating to urban system projects. None of the funds expended for the work of the demonstration project shall be subject to the provisions of Section 188 or 188.8.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 805, Sec. 1.   Effective September 14, 1983.)
-------------------------------------------

2301.

The department shall undertake the Prairie Creek Redwood State Park demonstration project or other projects as described in federal law in lieu of this project financed, in part, with funds made available by Section 152 of the Federal-Aid Highway Act of 1978 and Section 12 of the Federal-Aid Highway Act of 1981. The total of all funds expended to complete this project or other projects as described in federal law in lieu of this project shall not be subject to any of the provisions of Section 188 or 188.8.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 805, Sec. 1.   Effective September 14, 1983.)
-------------------------------------------

2302.

In addition to the purposes allowable pursuant to Section 193, the commission may allocate State Highway Account funds available for state highway purposes to meet federally required local financial matching provisions for interstate transfer projects. If the commission allocates the funds for that purpose, the department shall expend the funds or cause them to be expended for that purpose. Funds allocated from the State Highway Account pursuant to this section shall be deemed expenditures on the state highway system for purposes of Sections 188 and 188.8. Funds shall be allocated and expended pursuant to this section only if each of the following conditions exist:

(a) The project shall be a highway.

(b) The highway shall directly connect with a state highway.

(c) The highway shall be a substitute for a previously authorized interstate highway.

(d) The amount of state funding for the substitute highway shall be less than the estimated amount of the state share of the previously authorized interstate highway, both amounts to be calculated in current dollar values.

(e) The substitute highway project shall appear in the state transportation improvement program pursuant to Section 14529 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 660, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 6.5. Federal Aid for Highway Safety Improvements [2330. - 2334.]

2330.

This chapter may be cited as the Federal Aid for Highway Safety Improvements Act.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 1470.)
-------------------------------------------

2331.
